Hawaii statutes.
§602-7 Oaths, subpoenas. The supreme
court may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books,
papers, documents or tangible things, and any justice may administer oaths. [L
1892, c 57, §52; RL 1925, §2226; RL 1935, §3595; RL 1945, §9606; RL 1955,
§214-6; HRS §602-7; am L 1972, c 88, §2(c); ree L 1979, c 111, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Mentioned: 76 H. 273, 874 P.2d 1098 (1994).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next